Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Certain Public Safety Officers Permitted to Keep Badges upon Retirement

§ 45-1-71.
Full-time fire fighters and law enforcement officers permitted to keep badges upon retirement.

Each full-time fire fighter, employed in accordance with Section 45-11-203, policeman, sheriff, deputy sheriff or other local law enforcement officer, who retires under Section 21-29-139 or the Public Employees’ Retirement System, for superannuation or for reason of disability, or any other local government retirement system shall be allowed to retain, as his personal property, the one (1) badge which is issued to him by the local government fire fighting unit or law enforcement unit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 590, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.